apertium-id-ms.id.lexc
<t uman "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<t umbas "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<t umpat "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<t umpul "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<t umpur "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<t una "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<t unggal "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<t unggang "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<t unggik "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<t ungkus "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<t untas "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<t untung "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<t urangga "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<t urap "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<t urbin "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<t urbogenerator "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<t urbojet "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<t urbulen "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<t urbulensi "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<t urfat "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<t uristik "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u bet "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u budiah "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u da "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u dam "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u dar "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u di "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u dik "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u dim "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u do "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u du "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u duh "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u duk "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u dur "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u dut "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u ek "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u fti "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u fuk "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u gahari "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u gal "-" ugalan "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u ju "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u khrawi "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u let "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u li "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u lit "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u ltramikroskopik "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u ltramodern "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u lung "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u mbang "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u mbul "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u mi "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u muk "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u mum "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u nak "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u nam "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u ncang "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u ncang "-" uncit "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u ncit "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u ncu "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u ncue "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u ncui "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u nda "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u ndagi "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u ndak "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u ndan "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u ndang "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u ngah "-" angih "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u nggal "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u nggul "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u nggut "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u ngka "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u ngkah "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u ngkai "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u niform "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u niseks "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u niversal "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u niversiter "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u nsuri "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u rai "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u rban "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u rut "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u sam "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u sang "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u sil "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u srek "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u tama "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u tas "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u topis "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<u zur "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<v akum "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<v alid "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<v andalistis "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<v ariabel "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<v asal "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<v erbal "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<v erbalistis "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<v erbatim "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<v erstek "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<v ertikal "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<v eteriner "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<v iabel "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<v irilis "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<v irtual "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<v irulen "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<v isibel "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<v isual "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<v ital "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<v okasional "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<v olatil "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<v ulger "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<v ulkanis "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w adak "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w adi "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w afa "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w afak "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w afat "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w age "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w agon "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w agu "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w ah "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w ahadah "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w ahadaniah "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w ahadat "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w ahadiah "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w ahah "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w ahai "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w aham "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w ahana "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w ahdah "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w ahdaniah "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w ahdiah "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w ahi "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w ahib "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w ahid "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w ahon "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w ahyu "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w ai "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w aid "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w aiduri "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w aima "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w aisak "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w aisya "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w aitankung "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w aja "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w ajah "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w ajar "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w angi "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w antek "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w antilan "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w anti "-" wanti "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w aqaf "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w ar "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w ara "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w arak "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w arakat "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w arakawuri "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w arangan "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w aranggana "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w arangka "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w aras "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w arasah "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w arawiri "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w ardi "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w arga "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w aris "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w askita "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w edel "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w eduk "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w egah "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w ekel "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w erda "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w esternis "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w icaksana "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w igata "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w ujud "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w uker "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w uku "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w ukuf "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w ulan "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w ulang "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w ulu "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w ulung "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<w ungu "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<x erosis "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<x ifoid "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<x iloid "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<y ahud "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<y akin "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<y akis "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<y akitori "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<y akjuj "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<y uwana "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;


LEXICON Numeral
<s atu  "@P.POS.num@">        InflectionOption ;
<d ua  "@P.POS.num@">        InflectionOption ;
<t iga "@P.POS.num@">        InflectionOption ;


LEXICON Pronoun
<s aya "@P.POS.prn@" "@P.PERSON.p1@" "@P.NUM.sg@">       InflectionOption ;
<a ku "@P.POS.prn@" "@P.PERSON.p1@" "@P.NUM.sg@">        InflectionOption ;
<a nda "@P.POS.prn@" "@P.PERSON.p2@" "@P.NUM.sg@">       InflectionOption ;
<k amu "@P.POS.prn@" "@P.PERSON.p2@" "@P.NUM.sg@">       InflectionOption ;
<k amu:au "@P.POS.prn@" "@P.PERSON.p2@" "@P.NUM.sg@">    InflectionOption ;
<d ia "@P.POS.prn@" "@P.PERSON.p3@" "@P.NUM.sg@">        InflectionOption ;
<k ami "@P.POS.prn@" "@P.PERSON.p1@" "@P.NUM.pl@">       InflectionOption ;
<k ita "@P.POS.prn@" "@P.PERSON.p1@" "@P.NUM.pl@">       InflectionOption ;
<k alian "@P.POS.prn@" "@P.PERSON.p2@" "@P.NUM.pl@">     InflectionOption ;
<m ereka "@P.POS.prn@" "@P.PERSON.p3@" "@P.NUM.pl@">     InflectionOption ;

LEXICON Subordinating
<y ang "@P.POS.cnjsub@">        InflectionOption ;

LEXICON Determiner
<i ni "@P.POS.det@">            InflectionOption ;
